dev/saldo/saldo.nouns.dix
    <pardef n="e__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:na</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-na</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vim/mel__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>let</l><r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>mel</l><r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lump__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>orna</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>or</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ser/um__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>ana</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>umen</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>um</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>umet</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>um</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>um</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ja__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>na</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="deputerad__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ena</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="stall__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>arna</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ar</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="atri/um__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>erna</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>et</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>um</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="has__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>orna</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>arna</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ar</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>or</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="wiki__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>sarna</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>erna</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mät__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="aorta__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="rod/er__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ren</l><r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>erna</l><r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ret</l><r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kum/mel__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>let</l><r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>mel</l><r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>len</l><r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>mel</l><r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="tummel"><i>tum</i><par n="vim/mel__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="e"><i>e</i><par n="e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="kraftcentrum"><i>kraftcentr</i><par n="ser/um__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="fantasifoster"><i>fantasifost</i><par n="rod/er__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="sabelskrammel"><i>sabelskram</i><par n="vim/mel__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="radarvåg"><i>radarvåg</i><par n="lump__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="dropin"><i>dropin</i><par n="mät__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="symposium"><i>symposi</i><par n="atri/um__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="styrcentrum"><i>styrcentr</i><par n="ser/um__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="bankofullmäktig"><i>bankofullmäktig</i><par n="deputerad__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="skymmel"><i>skym</i><par n="vim/mel__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="skull"><i>skull</i><par n="mät__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="buffertlager"><i>buffertlag</i><par n="rod/er__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="språkcentrum"><i>språkcentr</i><par n="ser/um__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ljusvåg"><i>ljusvåg</i><par n="lump__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="skrammel"><i>skram</i><par n="vim/mel__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="vapenskrammel"><i>vapenskram</i><par n="vim/mel__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="paktum"><i>pakt</i><par n="ser/um__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="wiki"><i>wiki</i><par n="wiki__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="vimmel"><i>vim</i><par n="vim/mel__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="kollegium"><i>kollegi</i><par n="atri/um__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="kvinnoläger"><i>kvinnoläg</i><par n="rod/er__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="rö"><i>rö</i><par n="ja__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="gravkummel"><i>gravkum</i><par n="kum/mel__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="misskredit"><i>misskredit</i><par n="mät__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="bakhas"><i>bakhas</i><par n="has__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="tsunami"><i>tsunami</i><par n="wiki__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="konservatorium"><i>konservatori</i><par n="atri/um__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="yllelump"><i>yllelump</i><par n="lump__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="signum"><i>sign</i><par n="ser/um__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="svinstall"><i>svinstall</i><par n="stall__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="interneringsläger"><i>interneringsläg</i><par n="rod/er__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="kommunalfullmäktig"><i>kommunalfullmäktig</i><par n="deputerad__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="has"><i>has</i><par n="has__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="chockvåg"><i>chockvåg</i><par n="lump__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="ljuskvantum"><i>ljuskvant</i><par n="ser/um__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="septennium"><i>septenni</i><par n="atri/um__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="dubbelnelson"><i>dubbelnelson</i><par n="mät__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="deputerad"><i>deputerad</i><par n="deputerad__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="stadsfullmäktig"><i>stadsfullmäktig</i><par n="deputerad__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="guru"><i>guru</i><par n="wiki__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="blodvåg"><i>blodvåg</i><par n="lump__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="fullmäktig"><i>fullmäktig</i><par n="deputerad__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="register"><i>regist</i><par n="rod/er__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="kommerskollegium"><i>kommerskollegi</i><par n="atri/um__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="kummel"><i>kum</i><par n="kum/mel__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="vokalmummel"><i>vokalmum</i><par n="vim/mel__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ja"><i>ja</i><par n="ja__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="sari"><i>sari</i><par n="wiki__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="hejd"><i>hejd</i><par n="mät__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="kommunfullmäktig"><i>kommunfullmäktig</i><par n="deputerad__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="långvåg"><i>långvåg</i><par n="lump__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="serum"><i>ser</i><par n="ser/um__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="snällhetsguru"><i>snällhetsguru</i><par n="wiki__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="stenkummel"><i>stenkum</i><par n="kum/mel__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="stall"><i>stall</i><par n="stall__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="bärvåg"><i>bärvåg</i><par n="lump__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="safari"><i>safari</i><par n="wiki__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="kyrkofullmäktig"><i>kyrkofullmäktig</i><par n="deputerad__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="aorta"><i>aorta</i><par n="aorta__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="beneficium"><i>benefici</i><par n="atri/um__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ögonsikte"><i>ögonsikte</i><par n="mät__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="nyckelblomster"><i>nyckelblomst</i><par n="rod/er__n_nt"/></e>
